Utah statutes.
26-1-15.   Executive director -- Power to accept federal aid.

The executive director with the approval of the governor may accept, in behalf of the state, and bind the state by such acceptance, any executive or legislative provisions promulgated or enacted by the federal government or any agency thereof, whereby the state is invited, permitted, or authorized to participate in the distribution, disbursement, or administration of any fund or service, advanced, offered, or contributed in whole or in part by the federal government for purposes consistent with the powers and duties of the department. All applications for federal grants or assistance in support of any department program shall be approved by the executive director. If any executive or legislative provisions of the federal government shall require, as a condition to participation by the state in any fund, property, or service, the executive director, with the governor's approval shall expend whatever funds are necessary out of money appropriated by the legislature for use and disbursement by the department.



Enacted by Chapter 126, 1981 General Session

